Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.227

Mortgage loan origination—Independent contractors.

An independent contractor may not engage in residential mortgage loan origination activities as a loan processor unless the independent contractor obtains and maintains a license under this chapter. Each independent contractor *loan processor licensed as a mortgage loan originator must have and maintain a valid unique identifier issued by the nationwide mortgage licensing system **and registry.

[ 2009 c 120 s 12.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The term "loan processor" was changed to "loan processor or underwriter" by 2013 c 29 s 1.

**(2) The term "and registry" was removed by 2013 c 29 s 1.

Findings—Declaration—2009 c 120: See note following RCW 31.04.015.